vi: Vị trí ngăn kệ trong thiết bị: Nắp ngăn đựng rau củ; Nắp ngăn đựng thịt nguội/thực phẩm chế biến; Ngăn chuyển đổi linh hoạt; Ngăn đông; Cửa tủ lạnh; Bên trong tủ lạnh (ngăn chính); Kệ trượt; Kệ ngăn kéo rau củ; Kệ để rượu; Khác
el: Θέση ραφιού στη συσκευή: Κάλυμμα συρταριού για τραγανά δοχεία; Κάλυμμα συρταριού αλλαντικών/κρέατος; Διαμέρισμα ευέλικτης ζώνης; Καταψύκτης; Πόρτα ψυγείου; Εσωτερικό ψυγείου (κύριο διαμέρισμα); Συρόμενο ράφι; Συρταρωτό ράφι λαχανικών; Ράφι για κρασιά; Άλλο
nb: Hyllens plassering i apparatet: Deksel til grønnsaksskuffen; Deksel til delikatesse-/kjøttskuffe; Fleksibel sone-lomme; Fryseboks; Kjøleskapsdør; Kjøleskapsinnredning (hovedrom); Uttrekkbar hylle; Grønnsaksskuffhylle; Vinreolhylle; Annet
th: ตำแหน่งชั้นวางในเครื่องใช้ไฟฟ้า: ฝาครอบลิ้นชักผักผลไม้; ฝาครอบลิ้นชักเก็บเนื้อสัตว์; ช่องแช่อเนกประสงค์ปรับอุณหภูมิได้; ช่องแช่แข็ง; ประตูตู้เย็น; ภายในตู้เย็น (ช่องแช่เย็นหลัก); ชั้นวางแบบเลื่อนออก; ชั้นวางเหนือช่องผักผลไม้; ชั้นวางขวดไวน์; อื่นๆ
it: Posizione del ripiano nell'elettrodomestico: Coperchio del cassetto per frutta e verdura; Coperchio del cassetto per salumi/carne; Scomparto Flex Zone; Scomparto congelatore; Porta del frigorifero; Interno del frigorifero (scomparto principale); Mensola estraibile; Mensola cassetto verdura; Mensola portabottiglie; Altro
zh-TW: 設備中的層架位置: 保鮮抽屜蓋板; 熟食/肉類抽屜蓋板; 靈活區域隔間; 冷凍室; 冰箱門; 冰箱內部 (主隔間); 滑出式層板; 蔬菜抽屜層板; 酒類層板; 其他
fi: Hyllyn sijainti laitteessa: Vihanneslaatikon kansi; Liha-/herkkulaatikon kansi; Säädettävän lämpötilan lokero; Pakastimen osasto; Jääkaapin ovi; Jääkaapin sisäosa (päälokero); Ulosvedettävä hylly; Vihanneslaatikon hylly; Viinitelineen hylly; Muu
ko: 가전제품 내 선반 위치: 야채칸 덮개; 델리/육류칸 덮개; 맞춤보관실; 냉동실; 냉장고 문; 냉장고 내부(메인 칸); 슬라이드식 선반; 야채 서랍 선반; 와인랙 선반; 기타
pt-BR: Local da gôndola no aparelho: Tampa da gaveta de legumes; Tampa da gaveta de frios/carnes; Compartimento de zona flexível; Compartimento para freezer; Porta do refrigerador; Interior do refrigerador (compartimento principal); Prateleira deslizante; Prateleira da gaveta de vegetais; Prateleira de vinhos; Outro
tr: Cihaz içindeki raf konumu: Sebzelik çekmecesi kapağı; Şarküteri/et çekmecesi kapağı; Esnek bölme; Dondurucu bölmesi; Buzdolabı kapısı; Buzdolabının iç kısmı (ana bölme); Sürgülü raf; Sebzelik rafı; Şarap rafı; Diğer
ro-RO: Locația raftului în aparat: Capac sertar pentru legume; Capac sertar pentru mezeluri/carne; Compartiment cu zonă flexibilă; Compartiment de congelator; Ușa frigiderului; Interiorul frigiderului (compartimentul principal); Raft glisant; Raft al sertarului de legume; Raft pentru vinuri; Altele
pt-PT: Localização da prateleira no aparelho: Tampa da gaveta de legumes; Tampa da gaveta de frios/carnes; Compartimento da zona flexível; Compartimento do congelador; Porta do frigorífico; Interior do frigorífico (compartimento principal); Prateleira deslizante; Prateleira da gaveta para legumes; Prateleira para garrafas de vinho; Outro
en: Shelf location in appliance: Crisper drawer cover; Deli/meat drawer cover; Flex zone compartment; Freezer compartment; Refrigerator door; Refrigerator interior (main compartment); Slide-out shelf; Vegetable drawer shelf; Wine rack shelf; Other
sk-SK: Umiestnenie police v spotrebiči: Kryt zásuvky na ovocie a zeleninu; Kryt zásuvky na lahôdky/mäso; Priehradka flexibilnej zóny; Priehradka mrazničky; Dvere chladničky; Interiér chladničky (hlavný priestor); Výsuvná polica; Zásuvka na zeleninu; Polica na víno; Iné
bg-BG: Местоположение на рафта в уреда: Капак на чекмедже за зеленчуци; Капак на чекмедже за колбаси; Отделение за гъвкава температурна зона; Отделение на камерата; Врата на хладилник; Вътрешност на хладилника (основно отделение); Издърпващ се рафт; Чекмедже за зеленчуци; Рафт за вино; Друго
fr: Emplacement de l’étagère dans l’appareil: Couvercle de bac à légumes; Couvercle de tiroir à charcuterie/viande; Compartiment zone flexible; Compartiment de congélateur; Porte du réfrigérateur; Intérieur du réfrigérateur (compartiment principal); Étagère coulissante; Étagère du bac à légumes; Étagère porte-bouteilles; Autre
pl: Lokalizacja półki w urządzeniu: Pokrywa szuflady na warzywa; Pokrywa szuflady na wędliny / mięso; Komora Flex Zone; Komora zamrażarki; Drzwi lodówki; Wnętrze lodówki (główna komora); Wysuwana półka; Półka nad szufladą na warzywa; Półka na wino; Inne
cs: Umístění police ve spotřebiči: Kryt zásuvky na ovoce a zeleninu; Kryt zásuvky na uzeniny/maso; Přizpůsobitelný prostor; Mrazák; Dveře chladničky; Vnitřek chladničky (hlavní část); Výsuvná police; Zásuvka na zeleninu; Police na víno; Jiné
da: Hyldeplacering i hvidevarer: Låg til grøntsagsskuffen; Låg til delikatesse-/kødskuffen; Rum med flexzone; Fryserrum; Køleskabsdør; Køleskabets indre (hovedrum); Udskydelig hylde; Grøntsagsskuffehylde; Vinreolshylde; Andet
de: Regalposition im Gerät: Gemüsefachabdeckung; Abdeckung für Wurst-/Fleischschublade; Flex-Zone-Fach; Gefrierfach; Kühlschranktür; Kühlschrankinnenraum (Hauptfach); Ausziehbares Regal; Gemüseschublade; Weinregal; Sonstiges
hu: Polc helye a készülékben: Zöldséges fiók fedele; Húsos/csemegefiók fedele; Flex Zone rekesz; Fagyasztórekesz; Hűtőszekrény ajtaja; Hűtőszekrény belseje (fő rekesz); Kihúzható polc; Zöldséges rekeszpolc; Borállvány-polc; Egyéb
sl-SI: Položaj police v aparatu: Pokrov predala za sadje in zelenjavo; Pokrov predala za delikatese/mesnico; Predal za fleksibilno cono; Predal za zamrzovalnik; Vrata hladilnika; Notranjost hladilnika (glavni predal); Izvlečna polica; Polica predala za zelenjavo; Polica za vino; Druga
ru: Расположение полки в приборе: Крышка ящика для овощей и фруктов; Крышка ящика для деликатесов/мяса; Отсек с гибкой настройкой температуры; Морозильная камера; Дверца холодильника; Внутренний отсек холодильника (основное отделение); Выдвижная полка; Полка овощного ящика; Полка для винного шкафа; Другое
hr-HR: Položaj police u uređaju: Poklopac ladice za povrće; Poklopac ladice za delikatese/meso; Fleksibilni odjeljak; Odjeljak za zamrzavanje; Vrata hladnjaka; Unutrašnjost hladnjaka (glavni odjeljak); Izvlačna polica; Polica za povrće u ladici; Polica za vino; Ostalo
es: Ubicación en el estante del electrodoméstico: Tapa del cajón para verduras; Tapa del cajón de charcutería/carne; Compartimento flexible; Compartimento para congelador; Puerta del frigorífico; Interior del frigorífico (compartimento principal); Estante deslizable; Estante con cajón para verduras; Estante para vinos; Otros
lt-LT: Lentynos vieta įrenginyje: Traškių daržovių stalčiaus dangtelis; Deli / mėsos stalčiaus dangtis; „Flex Zone“ skyrius; Šaldiklių stalčius; Šaldytuvo durys; Šaldytuvo vidus (pagrindinis skyrius); Ištraukiama lentyna; Daržovių stalčiaus lentyna; Vyno lentyna; Kita
sv: Hyllplats i apparaten: Grönsaksfackets lock; Lock till delikatess-/köttlåda; Flexzonfack; Frysfack; Kylskåpsdörr; Kylskåpets insida (huvudfack); Utdragbar hylla; Hylla för grönsakslåda ; Vinhyllställ; Annat
nl: Schaplocatie in apparaat: Afdekking van de groentelade; deksel van de vlees-/delicatessenlade; Flex zone compartiment; Vriesvak; Koelkastdeur; Binnenkant van de koelkast (hoofdcompartiment); Uitschuifbare plank; Groenteladeplateau; Wijnrekschap; Overig
zh-CN: 器具中的支架位置: 保鲜抽屉盖; 熟食/肉类抽屉盖; 变温隔间; 冷冻室; 冰箱门; 冰箱内部（主隔间）; 抽拉搁架; 蔬菜抽屉搁架; 酒架; 其他
ja: 家電の棚の位置: 野菜室カバー; デリ/肉ドロワーカバー; フレックスゾーンコンパートメント; 冷凍庫; 冷蔵庫のドア; 冷蔵庫内部（メインコンパートメント）; スライド棚; 野菜ドロワー棚; ワインラック棚; その他